Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3107.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-25 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-25. Unfair discrimination prohibited.
Notwithstanding any provision of any policy of insurance, certificate, or service contract
issued in this state, whenever the insurance policy, certificate, or service contract provides for
reimbursement for any services that may be legally performed by any person licensed under the
provisions of chapters 29, 30, 35.1, and 37 of title 5, reimbursement under the insurance policy,
certificate, or service contract shall be based upon a determination of medical necessity and shall
not be denied because of race, color, or creed, nor shall any insurer make or permit any unfair
discrimination against particular individuals or persons licensed under chapters 29, 30, 35.1, and
37 of title 5.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Health-benefit plan” or “health plan” means a policy, contract, certificate, or
agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a healthcare entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, and includes individual and group
plans.
(2) “Healthcare entity” means an insurance company licensed, or required to be licensed,
by the state of Rhode Island or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner or the
jurisdiction of the department of business regulation pursuant to chapter 62 of title 42, that contracts

or offers to contract, or enters into an agreement to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including, without limitation: a for-profit or
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or plan, a health maintenance organization,
a health insurance company, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, accident and
sickness insurance, health benefits, or healthcare services.
(3) “Pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions” includes, but is not limited to,
childbirth, abortion, miscarriage, fertility, contraception, and lactation.
(b) An individual may not be excluded from participation in, be denied benefits of, or
otherwise be subject to discrimination under any health-benefit plan on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof.
(c) No healthcare entity may, in offering, providing, or administering a health plan:
(1) Deny, cancel, delay, limit, or refuse to issue or renew a health-benefit plan on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(2) Have or implement marketing practices or benefit designs that discriminate on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(3) Deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose additional cost
sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, to an individual on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof;
(4) Have or implement a categorical coverage exclusion or limitation for any health
services related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care, or reproductive health
care;
(5) Otherwise deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose
additional cost sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, for specific health services
related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care services and reproductive health
LC005638 - Page 2 of 12

care services if such denial, limitation, or restriction results in discrimination against a member of
protected class, as described in subsection (b); or
(6) Have or implement benefit designs that do not provide or administer health insurance
coverage in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of qualified individuals with
disabilities, including practices that result in the serious risk of institutionalization or segregation.
(d) Nothing in this section requires coverage of any health service where the healthcare
entity has a legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason for denying or limiting coverage of the health
service or determining that such health service fails to meet applicable coverage requirements,
including reasonable medical management techniques such as medical necessity requirements.
Such coverage denial or limitation must not be based on unlawful animus or bias, or constitute a
pretext for discrimination.
(e) The enumeration of specific forms of discrimination in subsection (c) of this section
does not limit the general applicability of the prohibition in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) No healthcare entity may discriminate with respect to participation under a health-
benefit plan or coverage against any healthcare professional who is acting within the scope of that
healthcare professional’s license or certification under applicable state law, on the basis of that
healthcare professional’s actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin,
including language; sex, including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender
expression, and pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight;
or any combination thereof.
(g) A healthcare entity shall provide the following information in a notice to enrollees of a
health-benefit plan regarding the nondiscrimination requirements of this section:
(1) A statement that the health-benefit plan does not discriminate on the basis of any
characteristic protected under applicable state law, including this section;
(2) Instructions on how an enrollee may file a grievance regarding discrimination;
(3) The healthcare entity’s internet website where an enrollee may file a grievance, if
available; and
(4) The healthcare entity’s telephone number that an enrollee may use to file a grievance
regarding discrimination.
(h) A healthcare entity or health-benefit plan found to have violated any provision of this
section shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions of chapters 14 and 14.5 of title
42, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-75 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC005638 - Page 3 of 12

27-19-75. Unfair discrimination prohibited.
Notwithstanding any provision of any policy of insurance, certificate, or service contract
issued in this state, whenever the insurance policy, certificate, or service contract provides for
reimbursement for any services that may be legally performed by any person licensed under the
provisions of chapters 29, 30, 35 [repealed], and 37 of title 5, reimbursement under the insurance
policy, certificate, or service contract shall be based upon a determination of medical necessity and
shall not be denied because of race, color, or creed, nor shall any insurer make or permit any unfair
discrimination against particular individuals or persons licensed under chapters 29, 30, 35
[repealed], and 37 of title 5.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Health-benefit plan” or “health plan” means a policy, contract, certificate, or
agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a healthcare entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, and includes individual and group
plans.
(2) “Healthcare entity” means an insurance company licensed, or required to be licensed,
by the state of Rhode Island or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner or the
jurisdiction of the department of business regulation pursuant to chapter 62 of title 42, that contracts
or offers to contract, or enters into an agreement to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including, without limitation: a for-profit or
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or plan, a health maintenance organization,
a health insurance company, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, accident and
sickness insurance, health benefits, or healthcare services.
(3) “Pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions” includes, but is not limited to,
childbirth, abortion, miscarriage, fertility, contraception, and lactation.
(b) An individual may not be excluded from participation in, be denied benefits of, or
otherwise be subject to discrimination under any health-benefit plan on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof.
(c) No healthcare entity may, in offering, providing, or administering a health plan:
(1) Deny, cancel, delay, limit, or refuse to issue or renew a health-benefit plan on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
LC005638 - Page 4 of 12

thereof;
(2) Have or implement marketing practices or benefit designs that discriminate on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(3) Deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose additional cost
sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, to an individual on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof;
(4) Have or implement a categorical coverage exclusion or limitation for any health
services related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care, or reproductive health
care;
(5) Otherwise deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose
additional cost sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, for specific health services
related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care services and reproductive health
care services if such denial, limitation, or restriction results in discrimination against a member of
protected class, as described in subsection (b); or
(6) Have or implement benefit designs that do not provide or administer health insurance
coverage in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of qualified individuals with
disabilities, including practices that result in the serious risk of institutionalization or segregation.
(d) Nothing in this section requires coverage of any health service where the healthcare
entity has a legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason for denying or limiting coverage of the health
service or determining that such health service fails to meet applicable coverage requirements,
including reasonable medical management techniques such as medical necessity requirements.
Such coverage denial or limitation must not be based on unlawful animus or bias, or constitute a
pretext for discrimination.
(e) The enumeration of specific forms of discrimination in subsection (c) of this section
does not limit the general applicability of the prohibition in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) No healthcare entity may discriminate with respect to participation under a health-
benefit plan or coverage against any healthcare professional who is acting within the scope of that
healthcare professional’s license or certification under applicable state law, on the basis of that
healthcare professional’s actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin,
LC005638 - Page 5 of 12

including language; sex, including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender
expression, and pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight;
or any combination thereof.
(g) A healthcare entity shall provide the following information in a notice to enrollees of a
health-benefit plan regarding the nondiscrimination requirements of this section:
(1) A statement that the health-benefit plan does not discriminate on the basis of any
characteristic protected under applicable state law, including this section;
(2) Instructions on how an enrollee may file a grievance regarding discrimination;
(3) The healthcare entity’s internet website where an enrollee may file a grievance, if
available; and
(4) The healthcare entity’s telephone number that an enrollee may use to file a grievance
regarding discrimination.
(h) A healthcare entity or health-benefit plan found to have violated any provision of this
section shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions of chapters 14 and 14.5 of title
42, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-71 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-71. Unfair discrimination prohibited.
Notwithstanding any provision of any policy of insurance, certificate, or service contract
issued in this state, whenever the insurance policy, certificate, or service contract provides for
reimbursement for any services that may be legally performed by any person licensed under the
provisions of chapters 29, 30, 35 [repealed], and 37 of title 5, reimbursement under the insurance
policy, certificate, or service contract shall be based upon a determination of medical necessity and
shall not be denied because of race, color, or creed, nor shall any insurer make or permit any unfair
discrimination against particular individuals or persons licensed under chapters 29, 30, 35
[repealed], and 37 of title 5.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Health-benefit plan” or “health plan” means a policy, contract, certificate, or
agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a healthcare entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, and includes individual and group
plans.
(2) “Healthcare entity” means an insurance company licensed, or required to be licensed,
by the state of Rhode Island or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner or the
jurisdiction of the department of business regulation pursuant to chapter 62 of title 42, that contracts
LC005638 - Page 6 of 12

or offers to contract, or enters into an agreement to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including, without limitation: a for-profit or
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or plan, a health maintenance organization,
a health insurance company, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, accident and
sickness insurance, health benefits, or healthcare services.
(3) “Pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions” includes, but is not limited to,
childbirth, abortion, miscarriage, fertility, contraception, and lactation.
(b) An individual may not be excluded from participation in, be denied benefits of, or
otherwise be subject to discrimination under any health-benefit plan on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof.
(c) No healthcare entity may, in offering, providing, or administering a health plan:
(1) Deny, cancel, delay, limit, or refuse to issue or renew a health-benefit plan on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(2) Have or implement marketing practices or benefit designs that discriminate on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(3) Deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose additional cost
sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, to an individual on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof;
(4) Have or implement a categorical coverage exclusion or limitation for any health
services related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care, or reproductive health
care;
(5) Otherwise deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose
additional cost sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, for specific health services
related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care services and reproductive health
LC005638 - Page 7 of 12

care services if such denial, limitation, or restriction results in discrimination against a member of
protected class, as described in subsection (b); or
(6) Have or implement benefit designs that do not provide or administer health insurance
coverage in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of qualified individuals with
disabilities, including practices that result in the serious risk of institutionalization or segregation.
(d) Nothing in this section requires coverage of any health service where the healthcare
entity has a legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason for denying or limiting coverage of the health
service or determining that such health service fails to meet applicable coverage requirements,
including reasonable medical management techniques such as medical necessity requirements.
Such coverage denial or limitation must not be based on unlawful animus or bias, or constitute a
pretext for discrimination.
(e) The enumeration of specific forms of discrimination in subsection (c) of this section
does not limit the general applicability of the prohibition in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) No healthcare entity may discriminate with respect to participation under a health-
benefit plan or coverage against any healthcare professional who is acting within the scope of that
healthcare professional’s license or certification under applicable state law, on the basis of that
healthcare professional’s actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin,
including language; sex, including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender
expression, and pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight;
or any combination thereof.
(g) A healthcare entity shall provide the following information in a notice to enrollees of a
health-benefit plan regarding the nondiscrimination requirements of this section:
(1) A statement that the health-benefit plan does not discriminate on the basis of any
characteristic protected under applicable state law, including this section;
(2) Instructions on how an enrollee may file a grievance regarding discrimination;
(3) The healthcare entity’s internet website where an enrollee may file a grievance, if
available; and
(4) The healthcare entity’s telephone number that an enrollee may use to file a grievance
regarding discrimination.
(h) A healthcare entity or health-benefit plan found to have violated any provision of this
section shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions of chapters 14 and 14.5 of title
42, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-88 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC005638 - Page 8 of 12

27-41-88. Unfair discrimination prohibited.
Notwithstanding any provision of any policy of insurance, certificate, or service contract
issued in this state, whenever the insurance policy, certificate, or service contract provides for
reimbursement for any services that may be legally performed by any person licensed under the
provisions of chapters 29, 30, 35, and 37 of title 5, reimbursement under the insurance policy,
certificate, or service contract shall be based upon a determination of medical necessity and shall
not be denied because of race, color, or creed, nor shall any insurer make or permit any unfair
discrimination against particular individuals or persons licensed under chapters 29, 30, 35, and 37
of title 5.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Health-benefit plan” or “health plan” means a policy, contract, certificate, or
agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a healthcare entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, and includes individual and group
plans.
(2) “Healthcare entity” means an insurance company licensed, or required to be licensed,
by the state of Rhode Island or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner or the
jurisdiction of the department of business regulation pursuant to chapter 62 of title 42, that contracts
or offers to contract, or enters into an agreement to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including, without limitation: a for-profit or
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or plan, a health maintenance organization,
a health insurance company, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance, accident and
sickness insurance, health benefits, or healthcare services.
(3) “Pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions” includes, but is not limited to,
childbirth, abortion, miscarriage, fertility, contraception, and lactation.
(b) An individual may not be excluded from participation in, be denied benefits of, or
otherwise be subject to discrimination under any health-benefit plan on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof.
(c) No healthcare entity may, in offering, providing, or administering a health plan:
(1) Deny, cancel, delay, limit, or refuse to issue or renew a health-benefit plan on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
LC005638 - Page 9 of 12

thereof;
(2) Have or implement marketing practices or benefit designs that discriminate on the basis
of actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex,
including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination
thereof;
(3) Deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose additional cost
sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, to an individual on the basis of actual or
perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin, including language; sex, including sex
characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and pregnancy, childbirth,
or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight; or any combination thereof;
(4) Have or implement a categorical coverage exclusion or limitation for any health
services related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care, or reproductive health
care;
(5) Otherwise deny or limit coverage, deny or limit coverage of a claim, or impose
additional cost sharing or other limitations or restrictions on coverage, for specific health services
related to gender transition or other gender-affirming health care services and reproductive health
care services if such denial, limitation, or restriction results in discrimination against a member of
protected class, as described in subsection (b); or
(6) Have or implement benefit designs that do not provide or administer health insurance
coverage in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of qualified individuals with
disabilities, including practices that result in the serious risk of institutionalization or segregation.
(d) Nothing in this section requires coverage of any health service where the healthcare
entity has a legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason for denying or limiting coverage of the health
service or determining that such health service fails to meet applicable coverage requirements,
including reasonable medical management techniques such as medical necessity requirements.
Such coverage denial or limitation must not be based on unlawful animus or bias, or constitute a
pretext for discrimination.
(e) The enumeration of specific forms of discrimination in subsection (c) of this section
does not limit the general applicability of the prohibition in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) No healthcare entity may discriminate with respect to participation under a health-
benefit plan or coverage against any healthcare professional who is acting within the scope of that
healthcare professional’s license or certification under applicable state law, on the basis of that
healthcare professional’s actual or perceived: race; ethnicity; color; religion; national origin,
LC005638 - Page 10 of 12

including language; sex, including sex characteristics, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender
expression, and pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions; age; disability; height; weight;
or any combination thereof.
(g) A healthcare entity shall provide the following information in a notice to enrollees of a
health-benefit plan regarding the nondiscrimination requirements of this section:
(1) A statement that the health-benefit plan does not discriminate on the basis of any
characteristic protected under applicable state law, including this section;
(2) Instructions on how an enrollee may file a grievance regarding discrimination;
(3) The healthcare entity’s internet website where an enrollee may file a grievance, if
available; and
(4) The healthcare entity’s telephone number that an enrollee may use to file a grievance
regarding discrimination.
(h) A healthcare entity or health-benefit plan found to have violated any provision of this
section shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions of chapters 14 and 14.5 of title
42, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005638
========
LC005638 - Page 11 of 12